Maryland, session 2026, SB0079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS ANY
PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR INDIVIDUAL USE, INCLUDING A SMARTPHONE,
A TABLET, A LAPTOP, A SMARTWATCH, OR SMARTGLASSES.
(B) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT A POLICY
PROHIBITING OR LIMITING THE USE OF PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICES BY
STUDENTS DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0079*

SENATE BILL 79
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
THE POLICY SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) FOR ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE SCHOOL STUDENTS, A
PROHIBITION ON THE USE OF A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE DURING SCHOOL
HOURS; AND
(II) FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS, A LIMITATION ON THE USE
OF A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
(C) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED HEALTH
ISSUE; OR
(3) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(D) A POLICY ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) PUBLISHED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COUNTY BOARD;
(2) PUBLISHED IN THE SCHOOL’S STUDENT HANDBOOK; AND
(3) REVIEWED EVERY 2 YEARS:
(I) FOR ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE SCHOOL STUDENTS, BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS, BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(E) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
TO ENFORCE THE POLICY ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS, INCLUDING IN–SCHOOL
SUSPENSIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.